Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 63

Military Property

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-63-101. Reciprocal agreements.

The Adjutant General is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with the Adjutant General of any surrounding state regarding the loan, lease, or exchange of Arkansas National Guard equipment under his or her authority and control.

History.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 55, § 1.

12-63-102. Legislative findings of fact.

The United States Congress has directed the United States Army to close certain military training posts. Fort Chaffee will be operated by the Adjutant General as a reserve component military training facility. Other agencies, departments, and political subdivisions of the United States or the State of Arkansas will or have indicated an interest to acquire or occupy portions of Fort Chaffee that are not needed for military purposes.

The Adjutant General is best suited to act as the executive agent of the state to negotiate with the Secretary of the Army and the various tenant agencies for the orderly administration of Fort Chaffee.

It is necessary for the state to amend certain laws concerning military reservations and to authorize particular activities on Fort Chaffee in order to facilitate administration and operation of Fort Chaffee as a military reservation.

Prepare a comprehensive study of all issues related to the closure and redevelopment of Fort Chaffee Military Base surplus properties and to ensure proper planning and optimal use of the property embodied therein;

Manage, own, and operate such portions of the base as the United States Department of Defense deems unnecessary to its overall military mission so as to yield the maximum benefit to the residents of affected counties and communities in the state after conversion of those portions; and

Act for other purposes as enabled and set forth in the Fort Chaffee Redevelopment Authority Indenture of Trust that are in the public interest and serve a public purpose and can best be accomplished by the creation of a public trust vested with the powers and duties specified in the Fort Chaffee Redevelopment Authority Indenture of Trust.

Redevelopment authority created by statute had the sole authority to determine the use of the land for which it was created, including parts of that land previously annexed by a city. City of Barling v. Fort Chaffee Redevelopment Auth., 347 Ark. 105, 60 S.W.3d 443 (2001).

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 50, § 207: approved Feb. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency declared to exist. Because the present general laws pertaining to the militia of the state have in many instances become obsolete; in other instances, sections thereof have been in conflict with the laws of the United States; in other cases, many conflicting, unworkable and redundant provisions exist; and because the recodification of the laws governing the state militia will correct the foregoing; an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after its passage.”

Acts 1979, No. 895, § 13: Apr. 16, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State of Arkansas owns and has a substantial investment in Camp Joseph T. Robinson and the lands and improvements devoted to their functions; that doubts exist concerning the right to police and regulate certain activities which should be regulated for the protection of lives and property on the Camp Joseph T. Robinson Military Reservation; that urgent reasons exist for providing for the adequate police authority which this enactment will achieve; and that only by the immediate passage of this act may these objectives be achieved. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety and for the protection of the public property, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 852, § 11: Mar. 28, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Adjutant General's authority to employ police officers for military reservations, and the authority of such police officers, is in need of clarification, and this act is necessary to so provide. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public health, peace, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2003, No. 1355, § 5: Apr. 15, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Adjutant General has been tasked by the United States and agencies of the State of Arkansas with the responsibility of providing security services and police protection to real properties adjoining military reservations that are owned by or under the control of instrumentalities of the United States and of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary to preserve domestic peace and provide security in the State of Arkansas due to the increased threats of terrorism in our country since September 11, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 682, § 3: Mar. 24, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the security of military reservations and enforcement of regulations thereupon are of paramount importance to the continued safety and security of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1201, § 1.

12-63-103. Fort Chaffee Redevelopment Authority Public Trust.

The State of Arkansas acknowledges and endorses the establishment of the Fort Chaffee Redevelopment Authority Public Trust, created by Sebastian County, on February 19, 1997, as set forth in the Fort Chaffee Redevelopment Authority Indenture of Trust and pursuant to the provisions of the laws of the state, including specifically §28-72-201 et seq.

The Fort Chaffee Redevelopment Authority Public Trust is recognized by the state as the entity to:

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1201, § 14.

Subchapter 2

— Policing and Regulation

12-63-201. Definition.

For the purpose of this subchapter, the term “military reservation” shall apply to and encompass all lands, buildings, and improvements used for military training purposes on:

Camp Joseph T. Robinson, both that portion owned by the State of Arkansas and used by the National Guard and that portion owned by the United States, which consists of thirty-one and one-half (31.5) acres more or less, and used by the United States Army Reserve, the United States Navy Reserve, and the United States Marine Corps Reserve;

Properties licensed by the United States to the State of Arkansas to use and occupy for year-round training and support of the Arkansas Air National Guard;

Taxiways, runways, and other airport land and improvements used by military aircraft in conjunction with and adjacent to those properties described in subdivision (2) of this section; and

Fort Chaffee, including that part owned, leased, licensed, operated, maintained, occupied, or controlled by the Adjutant General and that part owned, leased, licensed, operated, maintained, occupied, or controlled by any other component of the active or reserve military forces of the United States, or any other part that is leased, licensed, operated, maintained, occupied, or controlled by any political subdivision, agency, person, firm, corporation, or association for use by the active or reserve military forces of the State of Arkansas and the United States.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 895, § 6; 1983, No. 852, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1817; Acts 1997, No. 1201, § 3.

12-63-202. Police officers — Appointment — Qualifications — Removal.

The Adjutant General, as custodian of military reservations identified in § 12-63-201, may designate and appoint one (1) or more employees as a police officer or officers for each military reservation, who are peace officers under the laws of this state.

The police officers appointed under this section shall have all the powers provided by law for city police, county sheriffs, and state police officers, to be exercised as required for maintaining the peace, order, the regulation of traffic, and the security of state and federal property on the following:

The military reservation; and

Other real property that:

Adjoins a military reservation;

Is owned, leased, or is otherwise under the legal control of an instrumentality of the United States or an instrumentality of the State of Arkansas; and

The Adjutant General of the State of Arkansas has undertaken to provide with police or security services.

All police officers appointed pursuant to this subchapter shall meet the standards and qualifications established by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training created by § 12-9-103.

The Adjutant General shall have the authority to remove such employee or employees from the execution of such designated duties at his or her pleasure, and the termination of employment as a police officer shall forthwith terminate all peace officer authority of such person.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment, added the subsection designations in (a); added (a)(2)(B); in present (a)(1), inserted “the State of” preceding “Arkansas” and substituted “may” for “is authorized and empowered to” and “who are peace” for “who shall be and are constituted peace”; in (a)(2), substituted “The police officers appointed under this section shall have” for “and shall have” and added “the following added” to the end; and made related changes.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment redesignated former (a) as present (a)(1); added (a)(2); in (a)(1), substituted “under” for “pursuant to the authority contained in”; rewrote (b); and made related changes.

Adjoins a military reservation;

Is owned, leased, or otherwise under the legal control of an instrumentality of the United States or an instrumentality of the State of Arkansas; and

Is real property upon which the Adjutant General has undertaken to provide police or security services.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment inserted the subdivision (a) designation and rewrote the subsection; and added (b).

Amendments. The 2003 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “Department of Arkansas State Police” for “state police” and added “and on other real property that has all of the following characteristics”; added (a)(1) through (a)(3); and made minor punctuation changes.

Removing motor vehicles parked in violation of the rules at the expense of the violator who shall pay the expense before the motor vehicle is released;

Instituting a system of motor vehicle registration for the identification and regulation of motor vehicles regularly using the military reservation premises; and

Instituting a process for administrative adjudication for the violation of a military reservation rule promulgated under this section on a military reservation, which shall include the determination of:

A reasonable civil penalty;

The enforcement process for the collection of the civil penalty; and

A reasonable sanction for noncompliance.

Rules, together with any amendments thereto, which may from time to time be adopted by the Adjutant General for the regulation of operation and parking of motor vehicles shall be filed with the Secretary of State and shall be printed with copies thereof available at convenient locations at the military reservation or at any separate portion thereof.

Speed limits shall be posted at reasonable intervals, and traffic and parking directions and prohibitions shall be indicated by signs.

From and after the promulgation of the rules provided for in this section, it shall be unlawful for any person to operate or to park a motor vehicle in violation thereof.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “motor” preceding “vehicles” and “vehicle” in (a)(4); substituted “regulation of motor vehicles” for “regulation of vehicles” in (a)(5); and added (a)(6).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the section heading; deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the introductory language of (a), (a)(4), (b), and (d); and deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (a)(6).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a)(1), deleted “while using a motor vehicle registered as provided under §12-63-207(a)(5)” following “under §12-63-207”, and inserted “military”; in (a)(2), deleted “as described” following “determination” and “therefrom” following “appeal”; deleted former (b) and redesignated (c) as (b); and inserted “motor” preceding “vehicle” in (b).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of the Military” for “State Military Department” in (a).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 895, §§ 1, 11; 1983, No. 852, §§ 1, 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-1812, 11-1821; Acts 2003, No. 1355, § 1.

12-63-203. Police officers — Powers and duties.

(1)Except to the extent otherwise limited by the Adjutant General, a police officer appointed under this subchapter shall:

Protect property;

Preserve and maintain proper order and decorum;

Prevent unlawful assemblies and disorderly conduct;

Exclude and eject persons detrimental to the well-being of the military reservation;

Prevent trespasses; and

Regulate the operation and parking of motor vehicles upon and in all of the grounds, buildings, improvements, streets, alleys, and sidewalks of the military reservation.

All of the duties of police officers listed in subdivision (a)(1) of this section apply equally on other real property that has all of the following characteristics:

Adjoins a military reservation;

Is owned, leased, or otherwise under the legal control of an instrumentality of the United States or an instrumentality of the State of Arkansas; and

Is real property upon which the Adjutant General has undertaken to provide police or security services.

(1)The police officer may exercise police supervision on the following:

Military reservations;

Other real property that:

Adjoins a military reservation;

Is owned, leased, or otherwise under the legal control of an instrumentality of the United States or an instrumentality of the State of Arkansas; and

Is real property upon which the Adjutant General has undertaken to provide police or security services.

As a peace officer, the police officer may:

Arrest, with or without warrant, any person upon or in the areas described in this subsection who is or is reasonably believed to be committing offense against any law of the State of Arkansas on the military reservation; and

Deliver that person before any court of competent jurisdiction to be dealt with according to law.

The police officer may summon a posse comitatus, if necessary.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 895, § 2; 1983, No. 852, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1813; Acts 2003, No. 1355, § 2.

12-63-204. Police officers — Evidence of authority.

(1)Military reservation police officers shall be identified by a shield or badge bearing the name of the military reservation and the words “police officer”.

The shield or badge shall be conspicuously worn when the police officer is on duty.

The police officer's authorization shall be further evidenced by a certificate of appointment issued by the Adjutant General and carried on his or her person at all times when on duty.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 895, § 1; 1983, No. 852, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1812.

12-63-205. Police officers — Liability.

A police officer appointed and designated under this subchapter and any other employees authorized under this subchapter, who perform the duties under this subchapter are not personally liable for injuries to persons or for damage to property that occurs while acting within the scope of their authority on behalf of the State of Arkansas on the military reservation.

A police officer appointed and designated under this subchapter and any other employees authorized under this subchapter who perform the duties under this subchapter are not personally liable for injuries to persons or for damage to property that occurs while acting within the scope of their authority on behalf of the State of Arkansas on other real property that has all of the following characteristics:

History.

Acts 1979, No. 895, § 9; 1983, No. 852, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1820; Acts 2003, No. 1355, § 3.

12-63-206. Jurisdiction of law enforcement officers.

The appointment or designation of any police officer or officers under the authority of this subchapter shall not be deemed to supersede in any way the present authority of the Department of Arkansas State Police, that of the county sheriffs, or that of the peace officers of the jurisdiction in which the military reservation or portions thereof shall be located and on other real property that has all of the following characteristics:

Adjoins a military reservation;

Is owned, leased, or otherwise under the legal control of an instrumentality of the United States or an instrumentality of the State of Arkansas; and

Is real property upon which the Adjutant General has undertaken to provide police or security services.

None of the present jurisdiction or powers of the county sheriffs or the department shall be ceded to the police officers or over the land or property or persons on the land.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 895, §§ 1, 8; 1983, No. 852, §§ 1, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-1812, 11-1819; Acts 2003, No. 1355, § 4.

12-63-207. Motor vehicle rules generally.

The Adjutant General is authorized and empowered to promulgate rules, and to amend or change them from time to time as he or she shall deem necessary, providing for the operation and parking of motor vehicles upon the grounds, streets, drives, and alleys on a military reservation, including, but not limited to, the following:

Limiting the rate of speed;

Assigning parking spaces and designating parking areas and their use or uses;

Prohibiting parking as he or she deems necessary;

History.

Acts 1979, No. 895, §§ 4, 5; 1983, No. 852, §§ 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-1815, 11-1816; Acts 2015, No. 682, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 940.

12-63-208. Violations of motor vehicle rules.

(1)Persons violating rules promulgated under §12-63-207 shall, at the option of the police officer, be charged under the military reservation's system of charges or summoned to appear before any court of competent jurisdiction to be dealt with according to law.

A person adversely affected by any administrative determination shall have a right to appeal to the appropriate district court where the matter shall be heard de novo.

Notice placed on the motor vehicle shall be sufficient as a summons for the purpose of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 895, § 4; 1983, No. 852, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1815; Acts 2015, No. 682, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 941.

12-63-209. Criminal trespass upon a military reservation — Penalty.

A person commits the offense of criminal trespass upon a military reservation if he or she purposefully, and without authority, enters upon or remains unlawfully upon any military reservation, military armory, or other military building or property owned, leased, licensed, operated, occupied, maintained, or under the control or management of the State of Arkansas under the control and management of the Department of Military.

Criminal trespass upon a military reservation or other military property is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 895, § 3; 1983, No. 852, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1814; Acts 1995, No. 951, § 1; 1997, No. 1201, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 5536.

12-63-210. Arrest of trespassers.

The commanding officer upon any occasion of duty may place under arrest during the continuance thereof any person who shall trespass upon the camp ground, parade ground, armory, or other place devoted to such duty, shall in any way or manner interrupt or molest the orderly discharge of duty by those under arms, or shall disturb or prevent the orderly passage of troops going to or returning from any such duty.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 196; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1007.

12-63-211. Prohibition of sales, auctions, and gambling.

The commanding officer may prohibit and prevent the holding of auction or huckster sales, and all gambling within the limits of the post, camp grounds, place of encampment, parade, or drill under his or her command or within limits not exceeding one (1) mile therefrom as he or she may prescribe. He or she may in his or her discretion abate as common nuisances all such sales.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 196; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1007.

12-63-212. Prosecution of violations — Disposition of fines.

The prosecuting attorney shall appear and prosecute all actions arising in any court under the provisions of this subchapter.

All fines which may be collected by any court on account of violations of § 12-63-207 or § 12-63-209 shall be paid into the same fund as are fines levied for the same or similar violations by the court hearing the matter.

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 50, § 207: approved Feb. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency declared to exist. Because the present general laws pertaining to the militia of the state have in many instances become obsolete; in other instances, sections thereof have been in conflict with the laws of the United States; in other cases, many conflicting, unworkable and redundant provisions exist; and because the recodification of the laws governing the state militia will correct the foregoing; an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after its passage.”

Authority is granted the Adjutant General, the Treasurer of State, or other appropriate state officer to accept any federal grants or funds which are now or which may hereafter be available for the construction of armories or facilities in this state.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Rules” for “Regulations” in the section heading; and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a) and (b).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 895, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1818.

Subchapter 3

— Armories, Landing Fields, and Hangars

12-63-301. Purchase and construction.

The Adjutant General is given authority to purchase or construct armories, landing fields, or hangars, in the name of the State of Arkansas for the use and benefit of the Arkansas National Guard, at a place or places in the state as he or she may deem proper.

To enable the Adjutant General to carry into effect the power and authority conferred upon him or her, he or she is given authority to sign rental contracts, employ professional assistance, execute construction contracts and contracts of purchase, and take deeds and contracts of purchase or donations of property for the purposes herein specified in the name of the State of Arkansas for the use and benefit of the Arkansas National Guard.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 177, 181; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-801, 11-805.

12-63-302. Rules for use.

The Adjutant General shall issue rules governing the use of armories, landing fields, and hangars acquired under the provisions of this code.

The Adjutant General is authorized to appoint one (1) or more persons at the location of each armory, landing field, or hangar, who shall have charge of such property and govern the use of it in accordance with the rules issued by the Adjutant General.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 179; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-803; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 942.

12-63-303. Easements.

In addition to the foregoing, the Adjutant General, by and with the approval of the Governor, may, when he or she deems it necessary, grant utilities easements across any and all military reservations under his or her jurisdiction in such manner and under such conditions as he or she may impose, provided that the granting of such easements does not impair the use of the military reservation for military purposes.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 183; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-807.